Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1023
Electrology instructor, defined.

Electrology instructor means a person licensed under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act to teach any or all of the practices of electrology.

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 7;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 21;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-356.04;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 285.